Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5279.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-16-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-16 entitled "Teachers’
Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-16-5. Service creditable.
(a) In calculating “service”, “prior service”, or “total service” as defined in § 16-16-1, every
teacher shall be given credit for a year of service for each year in which he or she shall have served
as a teacher; provided, that any teacher who through illness or leave of absence without pay does
not serve a full school year may receive credit for a full school year of service by paying the full
actuarial cost as defined in § 36-8-1(9). Credit for leaves of absence shall be limited, in the
aggregate, during the total service of a teacher to a period of four (4) years; provided, however,
every teacher who had been required to resign for maternity reasons may receive credit for
maternity reasons by making contribution to the system upon her return to teaching the amount she
would have contributed to the retirement system, with regular interest, based upon her expected
compensation but for her absence due to maternity reasons.
(b) The retirement board shall fix and determine the time when and the conditions under
which the payments shall be made.
(c) Any teacher who serves or who has served during a school year the number of days that
the public schools are required by law to be in session during the year shall be given credit for a
year of service for that year. A teacher who takes an unpaid parental or medical leave during the

year shall be given credit for a year of service for that school year, provided they serve at least one-
hundred thirty-five (135) school days. In determining the number of days served by a substitute
teacher the total number of days served in any public school of any city or town in the state may be
combined for any one school year. Any teacher shall be entitled to “prior service” credit for service
prior to July 1, 1949, provided the teacher shall have been in service during the school year 1949-
1950. The teacher shall be entitled to service credit for any year subsequent to July 1, 1949 in
accordance with this chapter, by making contribution to the retirement system of the full actuarial
cost for any such service credit.
(d) Any teacher employed in at least a half (½) program including a job share program, or
working at least half the number of days that the public schools are required to be in session, shall
remain a contributing member and shall receive credit for that part-time service on a proportional
basis. The purchase of any remaining program or job share time in which the teacher did not work
shall not be permitted.
(e) In computing service or in computing compensation, the retirement board shall credit
no more than one year of service on account of all service in one calendar year.
(f) Notwithstanding any other section of law, no member of the retirement system shall be
permitted to purchase service credit for any portion of a year for which he or she is already receiving
service credit in this retirement system.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001050
========
LC001050 - Page 2 of 3